Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-911
Prohibited acts relating to equine;
violation; penalty.

(1) No person shall intentionally trip or cause to fall,
or lasso or rope the legs of, any equine by any means for the purpose of entertainment,
sport, practice, or contest. The intentional tripping or causing to fall,
or lassoing or roping the legs of, any equine by any means for the purpose
of entertainment, sport, practice, or contest shall not be considered a commonly
accepted practice occurring in conjunction with sanctioned rodeos, animal
racing, or pulling contests.

(2) Violation
of this section is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 11.